Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.555

Judicial information system—Database.

(1) To prevent the issuance of competing protection orders in different courts and to give courts needed information for the issuance of orders, the judicial information system or alternative databases must be available in each district, municipal, and superior court, and must include a database containing the following information:

(a) The names of the parties and the cause number for every order of protection issued under this chapter, protection orders provided by military and tribal courts, every criminal no-contact order issued under chapters 9A.46 and 10.99 RCW, every dissolution action under chapter 26.09 RCW, every parentage action under chapter 26.26A or 26.26B RCW, every restraining order issued on behalf of an abused child or adult dependent person under chapter 26.44 RCW, every foreign protection order filed under chapter 26.52 RCW, and every Canadian domestic violence protection order filed under chapter 26.55 RCW. When a guardian or the department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families has petitioned for relief on behalf of an abused child, adult dependent person, or vulnerable adult, the name of the person on whose behalf relief was sought must be included in the database as a party rather than the guardian or appropriate department;

(b) A complete criminal history of the parties; and

(c) Other relevant information necessary to assist courts in issuing orders under this chapter as determined by the judicial information system committee.

(2) Information within the database must be easily accessible and accurately updated as soon as possible but no later than within one judicial day.

(3) A document viewing system must be available as part of the judicial information system or other databases used by the court, so that in addition to having access to the summary information in subsection (1) of this section, the court is able to view any protection order filed within the state.

[ 2022 c 268 s 25; 2021 c 215 s 66.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.